Utah statutes.
17B-1-406.   Notice to county and municipality -- Exception.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), within 10 days after certifying a petition under Subsection 17B-1-405(1)(b) the board of trustees of the proposed annexing local district shall mail or deliver a written notice of the proposed annexation, with a copy of the certification and a copy of the petition, to the legislative body of each:

(a)  county in whose unincorporated area any part of the area proposed for annexation is located; and

(b)  municipality in which any part of the area proposed for annexation is located.

(2)  The board is not required to send a notice under Subsection (1) to:

(a)  a county or municipality that does not provide the service proposed to be provided by the local district; or

(b)  a county or municipality whose legislative body has adopted an ordinance or resolution waiving the notice requirement as to:

(i)  the proposed annexing local district; or

(ii)  the service that the proposed annexing local district provides.

(3)  For purposes of this section, an area proposed to be annexed to a municipality in a petition under Section 10-2-403 filed before and still pending at the time of the filing of a petition under Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(a) and an area included within a municipality's annexation policy plan under Section 10-2-401.5 shall be considered to be part of that municipality.

